Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 10
PESTICIDE APPLICATORS' ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 14 of chapter 6, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1990, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1990, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

35-10-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Pesticide Applicators' Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1576, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-101 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that pesticides perform a valuable function in controlling insects, rodents, weeds, and other forms of life which may be injurious to crops, livestock, and other desirable forms of plant and animal life, to structures, and to individuals. The general assembly further finds and declares that pesticides contain toxic substances which may pose a serious risk to the public health and safety and that regulation of pesticide use is necessary to prevent adverse effects on individuals and the environment.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1576, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-102 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Certified operator" means an individual who applies any restricted-use pesticides for a commercial applicator, registered limited commercial applicator, or registered public applicator, without the on-site supervision of a qualified supervisor and that should be licensed pursuant to section 35-10-114.

"Commercial applicator" means any person, other than a private applicator, who engages in the business of applying pesticides for hire or operating a device for hire that is designated by the commissioner as requiring licensure for use under this article.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other than a firearm, intended for trapping, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any other form of plant or animal life (other than man and other than bacteria, viruses, or other microorganisms on or in living man or other living animals); except that "device" shall not include equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately therefrom.

"EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.

"General-use pesticide" means any pesticide so designated by the commissioner or the administrator of the EPA.

"Limited commercial applicator" means any person engaged in applying pesticides in the course of conducting a business other than the production of any agricultural commodity; except that such application shall be only in or on property owned or leased by the person or the person's employer.

(8.5) "Local government" means a county, home rule county, city, town, city and county, home rule city, special district, or other political subdivision of the state.

"Pest" means any insect, rodent, nematode, fungus, weed, or other form of terrestrial or aquatic plant or animal life or virus, bacteria, or other microorganism (except viruses, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in living man or in other living animals) which the commissioner or the administrator of the EPA declares to be a pest.

"Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; except that the term "pesticide" shall not include any article that is a "new animal drug" as designated by the United States food and drug administration.

"Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances intended, through physiological action, for accelerating or retarding the rate of growth or rate of maturation or for otherwise altering the behavior of plants or the produce thereof; except that "plant regulator" shall not include substances to the extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, and soil amendments. Also, "plant regulator" shall not be required to include any of those nutrient mixtures or soil amendments which are commonly known as vitamin-hormone horticultural products, intended for improvement, maintenance, survival, health, and propagation of plants, which are not for pest destruction and which are nontoxic and nonpoisonous in the undiluted packaged concentration.

(11.5) "Private applicator" means any person who uses or supervises the use of a pesticide for purposes of producing any agricultural commodity on property owned or leased by the applicator or the applicator's employer or, if the pesticide is applied without compensation other than trading of personal services between producers of agricultural commodities, on the property of another person.

"Public applicator" means any agency of the state, any county, city and county, or municipality, or any other local governmental entity or political subdivision which applies pesticides.

"Qualified supervisor" means any individual who, without supervision, evaluates pest problems or recommends pest controls using pesticides or devices that require licensure under this article for use; mixes, loads, or applies any pesticide; sells pesticide application services; operates devices that require licensure under this article for use; or supervises others in any of these functions.

"Restricted-use pesticide" means any pesticide designated as a restricted- or limited-use pesticide by the commissioner or as a restricted-use pesticide by the administrator of the EPA.

"Technician" means any individual who:

Uses, under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, a device that requires licensure under this article for use;

Mixes, loads, or applies general-use pesticides under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, mixes or loads restricted-use pesticides under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, or applies restricted-use pesticides under the on-site supervision of a qualified supervisor; or

Evaluates pest problems, recommends products or treatments for pest problems, or sells application services under the supervision of a qualified supervisor.

"Technician" does not include any individual whose duties are solely clerical or janitorial or otherwise completely disassociated from pest control.

"Under the on-site supervision of" refers to work performed by an individual acting under the instruction and control of a qualified supervisor who is present at the work site at the time the work is being performed.

"Under the supervision of" refers to work performed by an individual acting under the instruction and control of a qualified supervisor, even if the qualified supervisor is not physically present at the work site at the time the work is performed.

"Use" means all aspects of the handling of pesticides, including but not limited to the mixing, loading, application or administration, spill control, and disposal of a pesticide or its container.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1576, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(8) and (15)(a)(II) amended and (8.5) and (18) added, p. 1373, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), and (8) amended and (11.5) added, p. 1259, § 1, effective July 1; (2), (13), and (15)(a)(I) amended, p. 291, § 1, effective July 1.

35-10-104. Scope of article.

Any person who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide or device in the state of Colorado shall be subject to this article and to any rules adopted pursuant thereto.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1260, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1578, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1260, § 2, effective January 1, 2007.

35-10-105. Commercial applicator - business license required.

Any person acting as a commercial applicator must possess a valid commercial applicator business license issued by the commissioner in accordance with this article and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. A commercial applicator business license may only be issued for the class or subclass of pesticide application in which the qualified supervisor employed or otherwise retained by the commercial applicator is licensed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1579, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-106 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-106. Commercial applicator - license requirements - application - fees.

As requisites for licensure, the applicant for a commercial applicator business license shall:

Obtain liability insurance in the minimum amount of four hundred thousand dollars with the provision that such policy shall not be canceled unless written notice is provided to the commissioner at least ten days prior to such cancellation; except that liability insurance policies containing a so-called "pollution exclusion" shall satisfy this paragraph (a);

Employ or secure the services by documented agreement of a qualified supervisor who is licensed in the class or subclass of pesticide application or device use performed by the business;

Provide verifiable training to all technicians in his employ according to standards adopted by the commissioner;

Identify all pesticide application equipment in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner;

If it engages in aerial application of pesticides, possess a certificate issued by the federal aviation administration as specified in license qualifications adopted by the commissioner.

Each applicant for a commercial applicator business license shall submit an application providing all information in the form and manner the commissioner shall designate, including, but not limited to, verification that the applicant has complied with subsection (1) of this section.

If a commercial applicator operates under more than one business name from a single location, the name of each such business providing services related to pesticide application shall be listed with the commissioner in the form and manner he shall designate. The commissioner may require that a separate fee be paid for each business name so listed.

No additional commercial applicator business license shall be required for such additional business names.

If a commercial applicator operates under more than one business name from a single location, the applicator must maintain separate pesticide application records pursuant to section 35-10-111 and separate business records for each such business name.

Each applicant for a commercial applicator business license shall pay a license fee in an amount determined by the commissioner.

The expiration date of each commercial applicator business license shall be determined by the commissioner, but the duration of such license shall not exceed three years.

Each licensee shall report to the commissioner, in the form and manner the commissioner shall designate, any change to the information provided in such licensee's application or in such reports previously submitted, within fifteen days of such change.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1579, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) and (5) amended, p. 291, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-10-106, 35-10-108, and 35-10-110 as they existed prior to 1990.

35-10-107. Commercial applicator business license - renewals.

Each commercial applicator shall make an application to renew its business license on or before the expiration date of the license. Said application shall be in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by the renewal fee.

If the application for renewal is not received on or before the expiration date of the license, a penalty fee of ten percent of the renewal fee shall be assessed and added to the renewal fee. No license shall be renewed until the total fee is paid.

If the application and fee for renewal are not received on or before the thirtieth day following the expiration date of the license, the business license shall not be renewed, and the commercial applicator shall apply for a new license.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1580, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 292, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 694, § 4, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-109 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-108. Commercial applicators - invoice notice.

Commercial applicators shall include a statement in conspicuous type on each customer invoice that indicates that commercial applicators are licensed by the department. Said statement shall be exactly prescribed by rule adopted by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1580, § 1, effective May 31.

35-10-109. Limited commercial and public applicators - no business license required - training - rules.

A business license is not required for limited commercial or public applicators; except that the commissioner shall require such applicators that apply restricted-use pesticides to register with the department. The commissioner shall determine the form and manner of the registration, as well as the amount of any administrative fees associated with the registration. A limited commercial or public applicator may register voluntarily, regardless of whether the applicator applies restricted-use pesticides, by submitting a request in the form and manner specified by the commissioner.

A public applicator shall not allow a person working for it to apply a general-use pesticide that has been listed by the commissioner by rule unless the person has been trained in the core elements of pesticide use as required by the commissioner by rule. The public applicator shall maintain a record of the training as specified by the commissioner by rule.

The owner or designee of a limited commercial applicator must be trained in the core elements of pesticide use as required by the commissioner by rule before applying a general-use pesticide that has been listed by the commissioner by rule. The limited commercial applicator shall maintain a record of the training as specified by the commissioner by rule.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1580, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1261, § 3, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 695, § 6, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-110. Registered limited commercial and registered public applicators - requirements for operation.

For each class or subclass of pesticide application a registered limited commercial or registered public applicator applies, the applicator shall employ at least one qualified supervisor who is licensed in that class or subclass of pesticide application or shall secure the services of such qualified supervisor by documented agreement.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no registered public applicator shall be required to pay licensing or certification fees for any qualified supervisor or certified operator whom the applicator may employ.

Every registered limited commercial or registered public applicator shall provide verifiable training to all technicians in its employ according to standards adopted by the commissioner. Such standards shall be identical to those adopted by the commissioner with respect to commercial applicators pursuant to section 35-10-106 (1)(c).

If the commissioner, pursuant to section 35-10-109, establishes a registry of limited commercial and public applicators, he or she may also require that each registered applicator report, in the form and manner the commissioner shall designate, any change to the information provided by such applicator to the registry or in any such reports previously submitted, within fifteen days after said change.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1580, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1261, § 4, effective January 1, 2007.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-113 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-111. Record-keeping requirements.

Each commercial, registered limited commercial, licensed private, and registered public applicator shall keep and maintain records of each pesticide application in the form and manner designated by the commissioner. The applicator shall retain the records for three years after the date of the pesticide application; except that the record retention period for private applicators is two years.

The records shall be kept as follows:

For a commercial applicator, at the address specified in the application for the commercial applicator's business license;

For a registered limited commercial or registered public applicator, at the address specified in the registry authorized in section 35-10-109; or

For a licensed private applicator, at the address of record on file with the commissioner.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1581, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1261, § 5, effective January 1, 2007.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 694, § 3, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-111 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-112. Notification requirements - registry of pesticide-sensitive persons - preemption - rules.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules for the establishment of a registry of pesticide-sensitive persons to be maintained by the department. Pesticide-sensitive persons may apply to be placed on the registry if they can provide proof of medical justification by a physician licensed in Colorado in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The proof of medical justification shall be updated every two years. The registry shall be updated at least annually, and the published registry shall be made readily accessible, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, to all commercial, registered limited commercial, and registered public applicators on record with the commissioner.

The commissioner shall provide standardized notification signs to any person accepted for the registry for such person to post on his property. These signs shall be designed, manufactured, and distributed solely by the department.

A commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator, prior to applying a pesticide in any turf or ornamental category, shall take reasonable actions to give notice of the date and approximate time of any such pesticide application, prior to the application, to any pesticide-sensitive person whose name is on the published registry and:

Who resides on the property to be treated;

Resides on property that abuts the property to be treated; or

Resides in a multi-unit dwelling that abuts a common area to be treated.

If two property sites would be considered to be abutting but for the fact that such sites are separated by an alley, for the purposes of this section such sites are deemed to be abutting.

A commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator in the wood-destroying organism pest control, residential or commercial pest control, or interior plant pest control categories, prior to making a structural pesticide application to a multi-unit dwelling, shall take reasonable actions to give notice of the date and approximate time of any such pesticide application, prior to the application, to any pesticide-sensitive person whose name is on the published registry and who resides at that multi-unit dwelling.

The commissioner may establish rules to further clarify the circumstances and manner in which notice shall be given to pesticide-sensitive persons.

Any commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator making a pesticide application in any turf or ornamental category shall, at the time of application, post a sign or signs notifying the public of the application. Such signs shall be posted at any conspicuous point or points of entry to the property receiving the application.

Any commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator making a pesticide application in any aquatic category shall post, at the time of application, a sign or signs notifying the public of the application. Such signs shall be posted in the manner designated by the commissioner through the adoption of rules pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The notice-of-application signs specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2) shall be water resistant and shall measure at least four inches in height and five inches in width. Each sign shall contain the following information in black lettering and symbols on a bright yellow background:

The word "WARNING", in at least sixty-point bold-faced type;

The words "PESTICIDES APPLIED", in at least twenty-four-point bold-faced type;

The symbol of a circle at least two inches in diameter with a diagonal slash over an adult, child, and dog; and

The name of the commercial, registered limited commercial, or registered public applicator that made the application, in at least eighteen-point bold-faced type.

If a commercial or registered limited commercial applicator makes a pesticide application on a commercial property site pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (2) and an owner of the site or an agent of an owner of the site is not present at the site, then, in addition to the information required by paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), the notice-of-application signs posted by the applicator at the site shall also contain the following information in black lettering and symbols on a bright yellow background in at least eighteen-point bold-faced type:

The telephone number of the applicator;

The name of the pesticide applied; and

The date the pesticide was applied.

No county, city and county, municipality, home rule county, home rule city and county, or home rule municipality shall enact or impose any notification requirements upon commercial applicators which are more stringent than those imposed by this article; except that each county, city and county, municipality, home rule county, home rule city and county, and home rule municipality shall retain the authority to impose any notification requirements upon private individuals, property owners, and the general public. Any such notification requirement imposed by any county, city and county, municipality, home rule county, home rule city and county, or home rule municipality on private individuals, property owners, or the general public shall not be held to be applicable to any commercial applicator, nor shall any commercial applicator be exposed to any liability for a failure to comply with any such notification requirement.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1581, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (3) amended and (2)(d) added, p. 1374, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(d) and (1)(e) added, p. 292, § 4, effective July 1; (1)(a), (1)(c), (2)(a), (2)(b), IP(2)(c), (2)(c)(IV), and IP (2)(d) amended and (1)(d) added, p. 1262, § 6, effective January 1, 2007.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections (1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(d) by House Bill 06-1239 and House Bill 06-1274 were harmonized.

35-10-112.5. Statewide uniformity of pesticide control and regulation - exceptions.

The general assembly hereby determines that:

The citizens of this state benefit from a system of safe, effective, and scientifically sound pesticide regulation;

A system of pesticide regulation that is consistent and coordinated, that creates statewide uniform standards, and that conforms with both state and federal technical standards and requirements is essential to the public health, safety, and welfare, and finds that local regulation of pesticides that is inconsistent with and adopts different standards from federal and state requirements does not assist in achieving these benefits;

Through statute and regulation, the state has created a system of pesticide regulation based upon scientific standards that protects the citizens of this state;

Although the cultivation of marijuana is illegal under federal law and so the use of pesticides in cultivating marijuana is not specifically allowed by any pesticide's label, the cultivation of marijuana is specifically allowed and regulated by Colorado law, and the use of pesticides should be regulated pursuant to this article and rules promulgated pursuant to this article rather than pursuant to local laws; and

Pesticide regulation is a matter of statewide concern.

A local government shall not adopt or continue in effect any ordinance, rule, resolution, charter provision, or statute regarding the use of any pesticide by persons regulated by this article or federal law and pertaining to:

Any labeling or registration requirements for pesticides, including requirements regarding the name of the product, the name and address of the manufacturer, and any applicable registration numbers;

The use and application of pesticides by persons regulated by this article or federal law, including but not limited to, directions for use, classification of pesticides as general or restricted use, mixing and loading, site of application, target pest, dosage rate, method of application, application equipment, frequency and timing of applications, application rate, reentry intervals, worker specifications, container storage and disposal, required intervals between application and harvest of food or feed crops, rotational crop restrictions, and warnings against use on certain crops, animals, or objects or against use in or adjacent to certain areas.

Subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) applies to the use and application of pesticides by persons regulated by this article or federal law in connection with the cultivation of marijuana.

Except as specifically provided in this article, any warnings and precautionary statements, notifications, or statements of practical treatment; or

Licensure, training, or certification requirements for persons regulated under this article, including any insurance and record-keeping requirements.

Nothing in this article may be construed to limit the authority of a local government as defined by state law to:

Zone for the sale or storage of any pesticide, provide or designate sites for disposal of any pesticide or pesticide container, adopt or enforce building and fire code requirements, regulate the transportation of pesticides consistently with and in no more strict of a manner than state and federal law, adopt regulations pursuant to a storm water management program that is consistent with federal or state law, or adopt regulations to protect surface or groundwater drinking water supplies consistent with state or federal law concerning the protection of drinking water supplies;

Take any action specifically authorized or required by any federal or state law or regulation with respect to pesticides, or to take any action otherwise prohibited by this article in order to comply with any specific federal or state requirement or in order to avoid a fine or other penalty under federal or state law;

Regulate the use of pesticides on property owned or leased by the local government;

Issue local general occupational licenses to persons regulated by this article.

This subsection (3) does not authorize a local government to utilize the police power or the authority to zone, to provide or designate disposal sites, to adopt and enforce building and fire codes, or to regulate the transportation of pesticides as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) to directly or indirectly regulate or prohibit the application of pesticides by persons regulated by this article or by federal law, including in connection with the cultivation of marijuana.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to be an implicit grant of authority to a local government that is not otherwise granted by state law.

Any local government that promulgates an ordinance that concerns pesticides, that is promulgated pursuant to section 31-15-707 (1)(b), C.R.S., or that is promulgated pursuant to any authority described in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section concerning pesticides shall file the following with the department of agriculture:

A certified copy of the ordinance; and

A map or legal description of the geographic area that the local government intends to regulate under the ordinance.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1375, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1), IP(2), (2)(b), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 15-1367), ch. 271, p. 1081, § 20, effective June 4, 2016.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 15-1367, see section 1 of chapter 271, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

35-10-113. Qualified supervisor - license required.

Any individual acting as a qualified supervisor must possess a valid qualified supervisor license issued by the commissioner in accordance with this article and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1582, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-105 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-114. Certified operator - license required.

Any individual acting as a certified operator shall possess a valid certified operator license issued by the commissioner in accordance with this article and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1582, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1377, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-10-105 as it existed prior to 1990.

35-10-114.5. Private applicator - license required.

Any private applicator who uses or supervises the use of a restricted-use pesticide shall possess a valid private applicator license issued by the commissioner in accordance with this article and any rules adopted pursuant to this article. An unlicensed private applicator may use a restricted-use pesticide under the supervision of a licensed private applicator for uses authorized by the licensed private applicator's license.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1263, § 7, effective January 1, 2007.

35-10-114.7. Licensed private applicators - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1263, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2007. (See L. 2006, p. 1263.)

35-10-115. Qualified supervisor, certified operator, and private applicator licenses - examination - application - fees.

Each applicant for a qualified supervisor, certified operator, or private applicator license shall:

Pass a written examination in each class or subclass of pesticide application, or device use, in which he or she wishes to be licensed;

Possess the degree of experience and any other qualifications which may be required by the commissioner for licensure under this section; and

If he wishes to be licensed to engage in aerial application of pesticides, possess a certificate issued by the federal aviation administration as specified in license qualifications adopted by the commissioner.

Each applicant for licensure under this section shall submit an application providing all information in the form and manner the commissioner shall designate, including, but not limited to, verification that such applicant has complied with subsection (1) of this section.

Each licensee shall be required to report to the commissioner, in the form and manner he shall designate, any change to the information provided in such licensee's application or in any such reports previously submitted, within fifteen days of such change.

Each applicant for a license issued under this section shall pay a license fee in an amount determined by the commissioner, after review by the advisory committee created in section 35-10-125.

The commissioner shall issue licenses to qualified private applicators on and after January 1, 2007. A license issued in Colorado by the United States environmental protection agency, issued to a private applicator before January 1, 2007, shall remain valid for purposes of this article through the expiration date of such license.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1582, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 293, § 5, effective July 1; IP(1) amended and (5) added, p. 1263, § 9, effective January 1, 2007.

35-10-116. Qualified supervisor and certified operator licenses - expiration - renewal of licenses - reinstatement.

Licenses issued pursuant to section 35-10-115 shall be valid for a period determined by the commissioner, but the duration of such license shall not exceed three years.

A licensee licensed pursuant to section 35-10-115 may have the option to apply to renew a license without further examination if he has completed, within the previous three years, the competency requirements established by the commissioner.

A licensee shall submit a renewal application in the form and manner designated by the commissioner on or before the termination date of such license and shall pay a renewal fee in an amount determined by the commissioner.

If the application for renewal of any license issued pursuant to section 35-10-115 is not postmarked on or before the expiration date of the license, a penalty fee of ten percent of the renewal fee shall be assessed and added to the renewal fee. No license shall be renewed until the total renewal fee is paid.

If the application and fee for renewal of any license issued pursuant to section 35-10-115 are not received on or before the thirtieth day following the expiration date of the license, the license shall not be renewed and the licensee shall apply for a new license.

Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, any license issued pursuant to this section that is not renewed on or before the expiration date of the license may be reinstated within one hundred eighty days after the expiration date upon:

Application and payment of a reinstatement fee as determined by the commissioner; and

Proof that all renewal requirements have been satisfied as of the expiration date of the license.

Licenses not reinstated within one hundred eighty days after the expiration date shall not be reinstated. The former holder of such a license who wishes to be licensed shall apply for a new license.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1583, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1) amended and (6) and (7) added, p. 293, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(5) amended, (SB 15-119), ch. 201, p. 694, § 5, effective May 19.